Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.615

Enumeration data used by the office of financial management for population estimates.

Actual enumeration data collected under RCW 35.13.260, 35A.14.700, 36.13.030, and chapter 43.62 RCW shall be used and retained only by the office of financial management and only for the purposes of RCW 35.13.260, 35A.14.700, 36.13.030, and chapter 43.62 RCW. The enumeration data collected is confidential, is exempt from public inspection and copying under this chapter, and in accordance with RCW 43.41.435, must be destroyed after it is used.

[ 2014 c 14 s 1.]